Washington statutes.
RCW 19.77.940

Prospective application—1989 c 72.

Chapter 72, Laws of 1989 applies prospectively only and not retroactively. The rights and obligations of chapter 72, Laws of 1989 shall accrue upon July 23, 1989, to all prior trademark registrations then in effect, and the provisions of chapter 72, Laws of 1989 shall not apply to any cause of action arising prior to July 23, 1989.

[ 1989 c 72 s 14.]